Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
ARTICLE 27.9
SPECIALIZED RESTITUTION AND
COMMUNITY SERVICE PROGRAMS

Section

17-27.9-101. Legislative declaration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article added, p. 262, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1172, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-302.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

17-27.9-102. Specialized restitution and community service programs - contract with treatment providers - division of criminal justice.

The director of the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety may, pursuant to section 17-27-108, contract with one or more public or private providers or community corrections boards, as defined in section 17-27-102 (2), who operate restitution and community service facilities, to provide specialized restitution and community service programs that meet the requirements of this section. As used in this article 27.9, such providers are referred to as "providers". The behavioral health administration in the department of human services shall approve any entity that provides treatment for substance use disorders pursuant to article 80 of title 27.

Any contract entered into for a specialized restitution and community service program pursuant to this section shall meet the following criteria:

The goals of the program shall include, but shall not be limited to:

A level of supervision for each offender appropriate to ensure public safety;

The reimbursement to the victim and to society for the damage caused by the offender's crime through restitution and community service performed by the offender;

The reduction of any substance abuse by any offender placed in the program, with the ultimate goal of abstinence from the use of drugs or alcohol by each such offender;

The reduction of recidivism by offenders who have completed the program;

The development of employment skills and the attainment of meaningful employment by any offender placed in the program;

The use of peer support and accountability for any offender placed in the program, and the continuation of services and ongoing participation in the program to maintain the offender's progress;

The enhancement of the educational skills of any offender placed in the program, including the enhancement of self-care and self-sufficiency capabilities.

The program shall consist of three phases as follows:

The first phase shall be intensive residential treatment;

The second phase shall consist of residential treatment in conjunction with gradual reentry into the community;

The third phase shall consist of nonresidential treatment.

The first and second phases may continue for up to nine months, and the third phase may continue for up to twelve months or longer if restitution and community service have not been completed. The degree of supervision during the third phase shall be designed to decrease in intensity as the offender responds to the program and becomes substantially reestablished in the community.

Victim restitution and community service shall be a primary emphasis in the second and third phases.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article added, p. 263, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 720, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 2653, § 131, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 784, § 27, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1303, § 134, effective May 25.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1496, § 24, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994. For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

17-27.9-103. Offenders who may be sentenced to the specialized restitution and community service program. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article added, p. 264, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended and (4) added, p. 1173, § 2, effective July 1; (2)(b) amended, p. 720, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-302.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

17-27.9-104. Contracts with providers - amounts - loans.

Any provider who contracts with the executive director of the department of public safety to provide specialized restitution and community service programs pursuant to section 17-27.9-102 shall be reimbursed on a per diem rate for residential supervision and a monthly rate for nonresidential supervision which rate shall be the final rate proposed by the provider during the competitive bidding process.

Any offender who has the ability to pay all or any part of the cost of the offender's treatment and room and board pursuant to this article through assets or through any employment during the second or third phase of the program shall be ordered to make such payments to the provider. Any moneys collected by the provider pursuant to this subsection (2) shall be used to offset payments made to the provider pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The amount of any such payments shall be set by the probation department after considering the offender's expenses for family support, victim restitution, and other living expenses.

Any provider who contracts with the executive director of the department of public safety to provide specialized restitution and community service programs pursuant to section 17-27.9-102 may use the payments which such provider receives pursuant to this section to match federal or private grants in order to fund the provision of additional specialized restitution and community service programs, so long as matching such grants does not cause a reduction in the available bed space and so long as matching such grants does not bind the general assembly to fund such programs in future years.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article added, p. 265, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended and (3) added, p. 1174, § 3, effective July 1.

17-27.9-105. Evaluation of specialized restitution and community service programs.

The director of the division of criminal justice shall conduct annual evaluations of each specialized restitution and community service program under which services are provided pursuant to this article. Evaluations shall include the consideration of the physical facility for each program, the financial operation of each program, and the effectiveness of each program in meeting the goals and requirements set forth in this article. The division of criminal justice shall develop specific evaluation criteria for each specialized restitution and community service program throughout the state after consultation with the local corrections board in the community where such program is located. Any provider that fails to meet the evaluation criteria within a reasonable time shall be subject to the termination of any contract entered into with such provider pursuant to this article.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article added, p. 265, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) repealed, p. 1267, § 185, effective August 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act repealing subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996.

17-27.9-106. Executive director of department - authority to accept funds - cash fund created.

The executive director of the department of public safety is hereby authorized to accept any grants or donations from any private or public source for the purpose of administering specialized restitution and community service programs pursuant to this article. Any such grants or donations shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the specialized restitution and community service cash fund, which fund is hereby created. The moneys in the fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly and, in accordance with section 24-36-114, C.R.S., all interest derived from the deposit and investment of this fund shall be credited to the general fund.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article added, p. 266, § 2, effective July 1.